Washington statutes.
RCW 43.22.380

Mobile homes, recreational or commercial vehicles—Manufactured for use outside state—Compliance not required—Exception.

Used mobile homes, commercial coaches, recreational vehicles, and/or park trailers manufactured for use outside this state which do not meet the requirements prescribed and have been used for six months or more will not be required to comply with those requirements except for alterations or installations referred to in RCW 43.22.360.

[ 2016 c 167 s 1; 1999 c 22 s 6; 1995 c 280 s 9; 1970 ex.s. c 27 s 5; 1967 c 157 s 5.]